Idaho, session 2025, H0194.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 42-5249, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-5249. ORDER ACCEPTING OR REJECTING PETITION. (1) If the board of
directors deems a proposed annexation not to be in the best interests of the
district to include the lands mentioned in the petition, the board shall re-
ject the petition. But if they deem it for the best interest of the district,
the board may order the lands mentioned in the petition or some part thereof
be annexed to the district.
(2) The order shall describe the lands to be annexed to said district
and the board may cause a survey thereof to be made if deemed necessary.
Thereafter the annexed land shall be subject to such assessments from time to
time as the board of directors shall deem right under the circumstances, and
such assessments shall be deemed to be assessments for benefits to said lands
by reason of their annexation to said district. The directors shall state
on their minutes at their next regular meeting which division and election
precinct in said district the said lands so annexed shall be attached, and,
if necessary, the board shall make an order redividing the district into
divisions and election precincts, in the same manner and to like effect, as
near as may be, as provided for that purpose on the formation of a district.
(3) If the board determines that it is in the best interest of the dis-
trict, the board may create additional divisions and election precincts in
the district following the annexation of additional lands. Any new division
created within the district for the purpose of conducting elections follow-
ing the annexation of lands must be consistent with the parameters estab-
lished in section 42-5208, Idaho Code. If the board creates a new division
and reallocation, the board shall make an order redividing the district into
divisions, including the new division and election precinct.
SECTION 2. That Section 42-5224, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


42-5224. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD OF DIRECTORS. The board shall, in
addition to any other powers and duties provided in this chapter, and pro-
vided that nothing in this chapter shall abrogate or impair the right of any
person to take any action necessary to acquire, protect, challenge or defend
any water right, have the following powers and duties:
(1) To acquire, and/or construct, operate, control or use by appro-
priation, grant, purchase, bequest, devise, contract or lease works or
facilities, water rights, water permits or licenses, well-drilling permits,
wells, pipelines, ditches and any other real and personal property (includ-
ing easements and rights-of-way) or contract entitlement within or without
the district necessary or convenient to fully exercise its powers;
(2) To sell, lease, encumber, alienate, or otherwise dispose of works
or facilities, water, water rights, wells, pipelines, ditches, reservoirs,
recharge facilities, and any other real and personal property owned by the
district within or without its boundaries, and to incur indebtedness on be-
half of the district as specified in this chapter;
(3) To enter into contracts and agreements, cooperative and otherwise,
including contracts with the United States of America and any of its agencies
or instrumentalities, and tribes, and contracts with corporations, public
or private, municipalities, or governmental subdivisions necessary or con-
venient to fully exercise its powers;
(4) To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers, hydrologists, ge-
ologists, and attorneys as shall be necessary and convenient to transact the
district's business and to represent the district's interests;
(5) To levy assessments for the operation of the district and its pro-
grams;
(6) To represent district members, with respect to their individual wa-
ter rights, in general water rights adjudications and other legal and admin-
istrative proceedings or before political bodies, provided that the board
may levy assessments for these matters against only those members who have
given written consent for the representation;
(7) To represent district members in proceedings or meetings of a water
district established by the director of the department notwithstanding any
provision to the contrary in chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code. Provided how-
ever, that the board shall not be authorized to cast a vote in any proceeding
or meeting of a water district established pursuant to chapter 6, title 42,
Idaho Code, on behalf of any district member who has, prior to such proceed-
ing or meeting, given written notice to the board and to the water district
that such district member intends to vote on his own behalf, or on behalf
of any district member who attends such meeting or proceeding and intends to
vote on his own behalf. The board shall provide a verified list of the water
rights that it represents at any water district proceeding or meeting to the
chairman of the water district proceeding or meeting;
(8) To appropriate, develop, store, and transport water within the
state;
(9) To acquire stock in canal companies, water companies, and water
users' associations;
(10) To invest any surplus money in the district treasury pursuant to
the public depository law as contained in chapter 1, title 57, Idaho Code;


(11) To develop, maintain, operate and implement mitigation plans de-
signed to mitigate any material injury caused by ground water use within the
district upon senior water uses within and/or without the district;
(12) To finance the repair or abandonment of wells in the ground water
district which have experienced or are experiencing declines in water level
or water pressures because of reasons including, but not limited to, flow,
leakage, and waste from improper construction, maintenance, and operation
of wells;
(13) To have and exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner pro-
vided by law for the condemnation of private property for easements, rights-
of-way, and other rights of access to property necessary to the exercise of
the mitigation powers herein granted, both within and without the district;
(14) To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits, actions and proceed-
ings;
(15) To enter into joint powers agreements and/or memoranda of under-
standing with other districts, governmental or quasi-public entities;
(16) To develop and acquire water rights for, and operate, aquifer stor-
age or recharge projects;
(17) To monitor, measure, study, and implement programs in the inter-
ests of the district's members regarding the protection of ground water di-
versions, depth of water in wells, aquifer water levels and characteristics;
(18) To adopt and amend bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and
laws of the state for carrying on the business, objects and affairs of the
board and of the district and to establish a fiscal year;
(19) To enter upon land to make surveys, locate district property,
works, or facilities, and to otherwise conduct the affairs of the district;
(20) To make, record and report annually to the director sufficient mea-
surements of diversions and water levels of district members to allow the
district to be excluded from any water measurements district created pur-
suant to sections 42-705 through 42-715, Idaho Code;
(21) To divide the district into divisions and precincts following the
annexation of lands under sections 42-5245 through 42-5250, Idaho Code, for
the purpose of conducting elections as long as any such division is consis-
tent with the parameters established in section 42-5208, Idaho Code; and
(21) (22) To manage and conduct the affairs of the district and to have
and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from
the specific powers granted herein. Such specific powers shall not be con-
sidered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out
the purposes and intent of this chapter.
SECTION 3. That Section 42-5240, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-5240. LIEN OF ASSESSMENT. From and after January February 1 of
any year, all assessments, other than those levied against municipalities,
shall be liens against the land of ground water users to which the water
rights used to determine assessments are appurtenant, and notwithstanding
anything to the contrary in this chapter or any provisions incorporated
therein by reference, shall be superior to the lien of any mortgage or deed of
trust, whether prior in time or not, provided that notice of the assessment
delinquency is sent to the mortgage or deed of trust holder at least sixty


(60) days prior to any foreclosure sale of the property. Said assessment
liens shall not be removed until the assessments are paid or the property
is sold for the payment thereof, and shall constitute such lien until paid.
Upon any sale of the property, the purchaser at such sale shall take the
property subject to any annual assessments of the district subsequent in
time to the assessment for which the foreclosure occurred. Nothing in this
section alters or affects any liens of water related districts or entities
authorized pursuant to Idaho law.
SECTION 4. That Section 42-5242, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-5242. ENTRY OF DELINQUENT ASSESSMENTS -- FILING OF DELINQUENCY
LIST. (1) On or before the 15th day of January February 15 of each year the
treasurer shall enter the amount of all delinquent assessments upon on the
assessment book, which entry shall be considered to be dated as of the first
day of January February. Such entry shall have the force and effect of a sale
to the treasurer of the district as grantee in trust for the district of all
property to which a lien has attached as a result of such unpaid assessments.
(2) The treasurer shall compile a list of such delinquency entries
which shall contain the names of the persons or entities to whom the assess-
ments were directed and the amount of such delinquent assessments together
with the amount of the penalties to be added thereto. A certified copy of the
delinquency list, duly acknowledged by the treasurer, shall be filed with
the county recorder of each county in which the properties affected by such
delinquent assessments are located, and the treasurer shall then provide by
certified mail a notice of delinquency to each ground water user having a
delinquent assessment.
(3) Upon the payment in full of any delinquent assessment and penalty
that was entered on a recorded delinquency list, the treasurer shall file
with the county recorder of each county in which the list of delinquent as-
sessments was recorded an acknowledged notice that the delinquent assess-
ment and any penalty owed has been paid in full. The treasurer shall file any
notices of payment of delinquent assessments with the county recorders, as
required, on at least a monthly basis.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.